en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.aff
FLAG long
SFX E5 Y 15
SFX E5 0 swoman [bdknmt] 
SFX E5 0 swoman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX E5 0 woman [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX E5 0 woman [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX E5 0 woman [^bdeknmt] 
SFX E5 0 swomen [bdknmt] 
SFX E5 0 swomen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX E5 0 women [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX E5 0 women [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX E5 0 women [^bdeknmt] 
SFX E5 0 swoman's [bdknmt] 
SFX E5 0 swoman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX E5 0 woman's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX E5 0 woman's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX E5 0 woman's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX E6 Y 3
SFX E6 y iful [^aeiou]y 
SFX E6 0 ful [aeiou]y 
SFX E6 0 ful [^y] 
SFX Ej Y 3
SFX Ej y ifully [^aeiou]y 
SFX Ej 0 fully [aeiou]y 
SFX Ej 0 fully [^y] 
SFX Ep Y 5
SFX Ep y iless [^aeiou]y 
SFX Ep 0 less [aeiou]y 
SFX Ep 0 ess ll 
SFX Ep 0 less [^l]l 
SFX Ep 0 less [^ly] 
SFX EQ Y 44
SFX EQ 0 tise a 
SFX EQ e ise [^l]e 
SFX EQ le ilise [^aeiou]le 
SFX EQ e ise [aeiou]le 
SFX EQ um ise um 
SFX EQ 0 ise [^u]m 
SFX EQ s se is 
SFX EQ 0 ise [^i]s 
SFX EQ y ise [^aeiou]y 
SFX EQ 0 ise [aeiou]y 
SFX EQ 0 ise [^aemsy] 
SFX EQ 0 tises a 
SFX EQ e ises [^l]e 
SFX EQ le ilises [^aeiou]le 
SFX EQ e ises [aeiou]le 
SFX EQ um ises um 
SFX EQ 0 ises [^u]m 
SFX EQ s ses is 
SFX EQ 0 ises [^i]s 
SFX EQ y ises [^aeiou]y 
SFX EQ 0 ises [aeiou]y 
SFX EQ 0 ises [^aemsy] 
SFX EQ 0 tised a 
SFX EQ e ised [^l]e 
SFX EQ le ilised [^aeiou]le 
SFX EQ e ised [aeiou]le 
SFX EQ um ised um 
SFX EQ 0 ised [^u]m 
SFX EQ s sed is 
SFX EQ 0 ised [^i]s 
SFX EQ y ised [^aeiou]y 
SFX EQ 0 ised [aeiou]y 
SFX EQ 0 ised [^aemsy] 
SFX EQ 0 tising a 
SFX EQ e ising [^l]e 
SFX EQ le ilising [^aeiou]le 
SFX EQ e ising [aeiou]le 
SFX EQ um ising um 
SFX EQ 0 ising [^u]m 
SFX EQ s sing is 
SFX EQ 0 ising [^i]s 
SFX EQ y ising [^aeiou]y 
SFX EQ 0 ising [aeiou]y 
SFX EQ 0 ising [^aemsy] 
SFX E8 Y 44
SFX E8 0 tize a 
SFX E8 e ize [^l]e 
SFX E8 le ilize [^aeiou]le 
SFX E8 e ize [aeiou]le 
SFX E8 um ize um 
SFX E8 0 ize [^u]m 
SFX E8 s ze is 
SFX E8 0 ize [^i]s 
SFX E8 y ize [^aeiou]y 
SFX E8 0 ize [aeiou]y 
SFX E8 0 ize [^aemsy] 
SFX E8 0 tizes a 
SFX E8 e izes [^l]e 
SFX E8 le ilizes [^aeiou]le 
SFX E8 e izes [aeiou]le 
SFX E8 um izes um 
SFX E8 0 izes [^u]m 
SFX E8 s zes is 
SFX E8 0 izes [^i]s 
SFX E8 y izes [^aeiou]y 
SFX E8 0 izes [aeiou]y 
SFX E8 0 izes [^aemsy] 
SFX E8 0 tized a 
SFX E8 e ized [^l]e 
SFX E8 le ilized [^aeiou]le 
SFX E8 e ized [aeiou]le 
SFX E8 um ized um 
SFX E8 0 ized [^u]m 
SFX E8 s zed is 
SFX E8 0 ized [^i]s 
SFX E8 y ized [^aeiou]y 
SFX E8 0 ized [aeiou]y 
SFX E8 0 ized [^aemsy] 
SFX E8 0 tizing a 
SFX E8 e izing [^l]e 
SFX E8 le ilizing [^aeiou]le 
SFX E8 e izing [aeiou]le 
SFX E8 um izing um 
SFX E8 0 izing [^u]m 
SFX E8 s zing is 
SFX E8 0 izing [^i]s 
SFX E8 y izing [^aeiou]y 
SFX E8 0 izing [aeiou]y 
SFX E8 0 izing [^aemsy] 
SFX Eq Y 22
SFX Eq 0 tisation a 
SFX Eq e isation [^l]e 
SFX Eq le ilisation [^aeiou]le 
SFX Eq e isation [aeiou]le 
SFX Eq um isation um 
SFX Eq 0 isation [^u]m 
SFX Eq s sation is 
SFX Eq 0 isation [^i]s 
SFX Eq y isation [^aeiou]y 
SFX Eq 0 isation [aeiou]y 
SFX Eq 0 isation [^aemsy] 
SFX Eq 0 tisations a 
SFX Eq e isations [^l]e 
SFX Eq le ilisations [^aeiou]le 
SFX Eq e isations [aeiou]le 
SFX Eq um isations um 
SFX Eq 0 isations [^u]m 
SFX Eq s sations is 
SFX Eq 0 isations [^i]s 
SFX Eq y isations [^aeiou]y 
SFX Eq 0 isations [aeiou]y 
SFX Eq 0 isations [^aemsy] 
SFX E- Y 22
SFX E- 0 tization a 
SFX E- e ization [^l]e 
SFX E- le ilization [^aeiou]le 
SFX E- e ization [aeiou]le 
SFX E- um ization um 
SFX E- 0 ization [^u]m 
SFX E- s zation is 
SFX E- 0 ization [^i]s 
SFX E- y ization [^aeiou]y 
SFX E- 0 ization [aeiou]y 
SFX E- 0 ization [^aemsy] 
SFX E- 0 tizations a 
SFX E- e izations [^l]e 
SFX E- le ilizations [^aeiou]le 
SFX E- e izations [aeiou]le 
SFX E- um izations um 
SFX E- 0 izations [^u]m 
SFX E- s zations is 
SFX E- 0 izations [^i]s 
SFX E- y izations [^aeiou]y 
SFX E- 0 izations [aeiou]y 
SFX E- 0 izations [^aemsy] 
SFX Es Y 33
SFX Es 0 tiser a 
SFX Es e iser [^l]e 
SFX Es le iliser [^aeiou]le 
SFX Es e iser [aeiou]le 
SFX Es um iser um 
SFX Es 0 iser [^u]m 
SFX Es s ser is 
SFX Es 0 iser [^i]s 
SFX Es y iser [^aeiou]y 
SFX Es 0 iser [aeiou]y 
SFX Es 0 iser [^aemsy] 
SFX Es 0 tisers a 
SFX Es e isers [^l]e 
SFX Es le ilisers [^aeiou]le 
SFX Es e isers [aeiou]le 
SFX Es um isers um 
SFX Es 0 isers [^u]m 
SFX Es s sers is 
SFX Es 0 isers [^i]s 
SFX Es y isers [^aeiou]y 
SFX Es 0 isers [aeiou]y 
SFX Es 0 isers [^aemsy] 
SFX Es 0 tiser's a 
SFX Es e iser's [^l]e 
SFX Es le iliser's [^aeiou]le 
SFX Es e iser's [aeiou]le 
SFX Es um iser's um 
SFX Es 0 iser's [^u]m 
SFX Es s ser's is 
SFX Es 0 iser's [^i]s 
SFX Es y iser's [^aeiou]y 
SFX Es 0 iser's [aeiou]y 
SFX Es 0 iser's [^aemsy] 
SFX E9 Y 33
SFX E9 0 tizer a 
SFX E9 e izer [^l]e 
SFX E9 le ilizer [^aeiou]le 
SFX E9 e izer [aeiou]le 
SFX E9 um izer um 
SFX E9 0 izer [^u]m 
SFX E9 s zer is 
SFX E9 0 izer [^i]s 
SFX E9 y izer [^aeiou]y 
SFX E9 0 izer [aeiou]y 
SFX E9 0 izer [^aemsy] 
SFX E9 0 tizers a 
SFX E9 e izers [^l]e 
SFX E9 le ilizers [^aeiou]le 
SFX E9 e izers [aeiou]le 
SFX E9 um izers um 
SFX E9 0 izers [^u]m 
SFX E9 s zers is 
SFX E9 0 izers [^i]s 
SFX E9 y izers [^aeiou]y 
SFX E9 0 izers [aeiou]y 
SFX E9 0 izers [^aemsy] 
SFX E9 0 tizer's a 
SFX E9 e izer's [^l]e 
SFX E9 le ilizer's [^aeiou]le 
SFX E9 e izer's [aeiou]le 
SFX E9 um izer's um 
SFX E9 0 izer's [^u]m 
SFX E9 s zer's is 
SFX E9 0 izer's [^i]s 
SFX E9 y izer's [^aeiou]y 
SFX E9 0 izer's [aeiou]y 
SFX E9 0 izer's [^aemsy] 
SFX Et Y 22
SFX Et 0 tisable a 
SFX Et e isable [^l]e 
SFX Et le ilisable [^aeiou]le 
SFX Et e isable [aeiou]le 
SFX Et um isable um 
SFX Et 0 isable [^u]m 
SFX Et s sable is 
SFX Et 0 isable [^i]s 
SFX Et y isable [^aeiou]y 
SFX Et 0 isable [aeiou]y 
SFX Et 0 isable [^aemsy] 
SFX Et 0 tisability a 
SFX Et e isability [^l]e 
SFX Et le ilisability [^aeiou]le 
SFX Et e isability [aeiou]le 
SFX Et um isability um 
SFX Et 0 isability [^u]m 
SFX Et s sability is 
SFX Et 0 isability [^i]s 
SFX Et y isability [^aeiou]y 
SFX Et 0 isability [aeiou]y 
SFX Et 0 isability [^aemsy] 
SFX E+ Y 22
SFX E+ 0 tizable a 
SFX E+ e izable [^l]e 
SFX E+ le ilizable [^aeiou]le 
SFX E+ e izable [aeiou]le 
SFX E+ um izable um 
SFX E+ 0 izable [^u]m 
SFX E+ s zable is 
SFX E+ 0 izable [^i]s 
SFX E+ y izable [^aeiou]y 
SFX E+ 0 izable [aeiou]y 
SFX E+ 0 izable [^aemsy] 
SFX E+ 0 tizability a 
SFX E+ e izability [^l]e 
SFX E+ le ilizability [^aeiou]le 
SFX E+ e izability [aeiou]le 
SFX E+ um izability um 
SFX E+ 0 izability [^u]m 
SFX E+ s zability is 
SFX E+ 0 izability [^i]s 
SFX E+ y izability [^aeiou]y 
SFX E+ 0 izability [aeiou]y 
SFX E+ 0 izability [^aemsy] 
SFX EM Y 1
SFX EM 0 's . 
