en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.dic
agony/EQE8ESEsE9
Allison/EM
alphabet/EsEQE-ESEWE8E9EqE1EMEw
American/EQEqE-E8EMES
anathema/EMEQE8ES
anchor/EmE5EdESEM
animal/EQE8ESE-EqEM
apology/ESEQE8EsE9EME3
apostrophe/EQE8ESEM
archetype/EwEMES
assembly/EmE5ESEM
atom/EQEsE-E9E8EMEqES
author/EQEsE-E9EdE8EqESEM
baklava/EM
bane/EME6Ej
barn/EMEDESE6EG
basket/E6ESEMEy
beard/EpESEGEiEDEM
beauty/EjESEME6
bethel/EM
boast/EDEREGE6EjEJES
body/EpEDEMESEYEG
bounty/E6EDEjESEM
Boyce/EM
brain/EGEDE2EpEMEZES
brutal/EqEQE8E-
bucket/ESEdE6EM
bureaucrat/E1EQEWEqE8ESEME-
cadence/ECEMES
camera/EMEmESE5
canal/EqE-EGESEMEQE8ED
canon/EwEMEWE-E1EqEQE8ESE3
canonical/EQE8EqE-
capital/E-EqEMEQEsE8E9E3ES
capsule/E8ESEQEMEGED
carbon/EsEQE9ESE8EWE-ENEqEMEn
care/E6EjESEp
cash/EDEGESEpEM
category/EwEqE8EWE9EQEsE-ESEME1
catheter/E8EQEMES
central/EqEsEQE8E9E-E3
chair/EMEGEmE5ESED
chamber/ErEdEMES
channel/EqEsE-E9EJESEQE8EREGEDEM
character/EsEQE9E8EtE+EdEpEqE6E-EMES
char/E5EGEDES
charm/EMEREGEkEDEpES
cheer/EREDEpE6EGE2EZEjESEz
civil/EsE9EqEQE-E8EY
class/E2EGEZEDEMEwEpESE1
clergy/E5EmESEM
cockatoo/ESEM
collective/EqE3E8ESEQE-
colon/E9EMEWEQEsEqE3E-E8ES
computer/EQE8EqE-
conceptual/E-EQE8Eq
congress/EmExEME5EGESED
conscience/Ep
contextual/EQE-EqE8
co-operation/EM
council/ESEmEME5
craft/EDEmE5E2EMEGEzEZES
criminal/EqEQE8E-ESEMEY
critic/EYEQE8ESEsE9EM
crotch/EDESEpEM
custom/EsEQE-E9EMErE8EqESEtE+
cutlet/EMES
dairy/EmE5EMESEG
deceit/ESE6EjEM
defence/Ep
delight/E6EjEhEGEi
democrat/EqEQE8E1E-EWESEM
departmental/EQE8E-Eq
d/EtEo
diagonal/EtEQE+E8ESEY
diffusion/EM
digital/E-EqEQE9EsE8EY
dire/EPETEjE6EY
disgust/EkE6EjEh
disregard/E6
drama/EsE9EQE8EqE-ESEM
draught/EzEmE5E2ESEZ
Dutch/E5Em
duty/E6EjEMESE7
dystopia/EM
ear/E6ESEYEMED
edge/EDEZEMEGEREpESEJ
editorial/EsE3EQE8E9ESEY
elastic/ESEQE8EY
English/EmE5EM
epitome/EsE-E9EqEQE8EMES
equal/EsE9EQE-EDEGEYEqESE8
escarpment/ESEM
ether/EMEQE8ES
eulogy/EQE9EsE3E8ESEM
European/EQE8EMEqE-ES
external/EqEQE-E8EYEsE9ES
factor/EQE8EtE+EdE-EMEqES
faith/E6EDEjEpEMEGES
fancy/ERETEjEPEYEDESE6EG
fantasy/EQE8EWEsE9EDESEGEM
fate/EjESE6EDEM
father/EdEpESEYEM
federal/EqE-EQE8E3EY
fictional/EQE8EqE-
Fidelio/EM
fit/EREPETEJESEGE6EYEDEjEM
flesh/EpEYE2EMEDEGEZES
fluid/EQE8EsE9EPESEYEM
fore/E5Em
forget/EjEGESE6
French/EmE5EM
fret/EjEDE6ESEG
frigate/ESEM
fright/EDEGEMEjESE6
general/EQE8EPEtEqE9E3E+EsE-ESEM
gentle/E5EPEYEmETEGED
ghetto/EQESEDEGEM
glass/E2EDE6EMEGEZEzESEp
glee/EjESEME6
goldfinch/ESEM
grate/EjEREGE6ESEDEkEJ
guile/EpEME6Ej
hair/EpE2EZESEMED
Harley/EM
harm/EGESEjEpEME6ED
heed/E6EMEGEDEjEpES
help/ERESEjEpEDE6EJEG
horse/EYEmEGE5EDEMESEp
hovercraft/EM
human/EsEQE8EYE3E-EqE9EPES
hurt/EkEjEGE6ES
ideal/ESEqEQE-E8EsE9E3EM
immune/EqE-EQE8
improve/EqEQE9ELEsE8
individual/EsEYE3E8EQE-E9EMEqES
industrial/E8EQE3E-EqES
initial/EQEsE-E8E9EqEDESEY
instant/ESEYEM
internal/EsE9ESEQE8EqE-
international/E3EQE8E-EqES
ion/EsE9EMEWEqEQE8E-ES
Irish/EmE5
item/EqEsEQE9E8E-ESEM
journal/E9EQE8E3EDEsESEMEG
joy/EpEMEDEGE6EjES
jury/E3E5EDEmEMESEG
kelp/EDEGESEM
kid/EREDEMESEGEp
kin/E5ESEmEM
legal/EQE8EqE-ES
legitimate/EYEGEQENED
linear/EtEYEQ
lip/EpESEDEZEGEM
local/EqEYEQEsE8ESE9E-
lust/EGEZESEDEjEzE6E2EM
maggot/EMES
magnet/EWEqEQE8E-ESEMEtE+E1
marginal/EQE8EqE-ES
material/EqEsE3E9ESE-EMEPEQE8
memory/EsE9EQE8EoEqE-ESEM
mercy/ESE6EjEpEM
mind/EpEhESEiERE6EDEjEMEG
mineral/EQEqE8E-ESEM
minim/EsE9EQE8ESE-EqEMEo
mobile/EIEQE-E+E9EsEtEqE8
modern/EQE8EYETEPEsE9EqE-
monopole/EQE8EZEsE3E-ES
moral/E-EQEsE8E3ESEM
Moroni/EM
nap/EpERESEZEGEMED
nasal/E-EYEqEQE8ES
national/E8E-ESE9EQEsEqE3
need/EZEDESEpEjE2E6EG
needle/EDE5EGERESEM
neutral/EQE8E-ESEsEY
news/EZEmE5Ep
normal/E8EQEsE+E-EtEqES
oars/EmE5
Omagh/EM
optimum/EqEsE8EQE-E9ESEM
organ/EWE3EqE-EQE8E1EsE9EtE+ESEM
oxide/EQE-EnESEMEs
pain/EDEMEpESEjEGE6
paper/E2EpEdErEZ
particular/EQE8ESEY
patron/E9E8EQE-EYEMEqEsES
pedestrian/EQE-E8EqEMES
pilchard/EMES
pity/ESEGEMEREjEpEkElEDE7E6
plastic/EYEQE8EsE9EMES
plenty/EME6Ej
polar/EQE-E8EqESEs
politic/EQE8E-EGEDESEq
polymer/EQE8E-EqEMES
power/E6EjEdEpESEM
prayer/EjE6
pre/EQE8Es
pressure/EME8EqE-E9EGEQEsEDES
pride/EDEGEjE6ESEM
priority/EQE8EqE-EsE9ESEM
proselyte/EME8EGEsEQE9EDES
quantum/EqEQEsE8EME-E9
rabbinate/EMES
random/EqEQE-E8EYEP
real/ETEtEsE3E+E9EqE-EQE8EY
remorse/EpEMEjE6
reproach/EkEDESE6EGE7Ej
resource/E6EjEp
rest/E6EVEjEpEvEGEuEDEMES
rev/EQEsESEDEG
right/EREPE7EDEjEGE3E6ESEY
ritual/EQESE8EYEM
sale/EBEMEmE5ES
Salome/EM
sap/EDEMEREZEGE2EpES
satire/EWEQE8EwEME1ESE3
scoop/EMEGESE6ERED
scorn/EjEDEREMEGE6ES
sensational/EQE8E3
serial/EqEQE-E8ESEY
sermon/EQE8ESEM
service/EmEBE5EDEMESEG
shame/E6EMEjEpES
signal/E-EMEqEREQE8EGEDEmESEY
skirmish/EDESEREGEM
sleeve/ESEMEGEDEp
social/EQE8EsE3E9ESEqE-EY
solemn/E-EqEQE8ETEY
sorrow/EDEGEME6EjES
soul/EpESE6EMEj
spoke/EDEmE5ES
stain/ESEpEDEG
standard/EsE9EqEQE-E8ES
states/E5Em
sterile/EQE8EqE-EsE9
stigma/EQE8EWEqE-ESEM
subside/EqEQE-E8EDEZEGEsE9ES
Sufism/EM
summary/ESEsE9EQE8EMEY
summit/ESEpEM
symbol/E1E3EWEQE8E-EqESEwEM
sympathy/ESEQE9EsE8EWEM
synchrony/E8E9EsEqEQE-
tank/EGEMERE6EDES
taste/EEEME6EjES
tender/EPEdEQE8EYEsE9
terror/EqEsE9EQE8E3E-ESEM
thrift/E2EpESEMEzEZ
token/ESEQEME8
totem/EMES
town/ESEmEME5
tranquilly/EQE8EqE-EsE9
trauma/EQE8ESEWE1EM
tribe/ESEmEME5
trivial/EQE8EqE-
truth/EMEUESEjE6
utile/E-E8EqEQ
verbal/EqEsE8E9EQEYE-
view/EJEpEDEREGESE7EM
vital/EQE8ESE-Eq
vocal/E9E8E-EQE3EsEqESEY
volatile/EqEQE8E-ES
vulgar/EQE-E8EYEq
wallflower/ESEM
wish/ERESEjEGEDE6EZ
woman/EMEsEQEY
wonder/EjELESEdEkEME6
worth/EpEZEzE2
wrath/EjEME6
yacht/E5EmEMESEDEG
